Tennessee, session 114, SB0263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The World Health Organization, the United Nations, and the World Economic
Forum have no jurisdiction in this state. This state and its political subdivisions must not
be compelled to enforce, or collaborate with the enforcement of, requirements or
mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United Nations, or the World
Economic Forum.
(b) Requirements or mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the
United Nations, or the World Economic Forum must not be used in this state as a basis
for action, or to direct, order, or otherwise impose, contrary to this state's constitution
and the laws of this state, any requirements whatsoever, including those for masks,
vaccines, or medical testing, or to gather public or private information about this state's
citizens or residents, and such requirements or mandates have no force or effect in this
state or its political subdivisions.
(c) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means a municipality; public
corporation; body politic; authority; district; metropolitan government; county; an agency,
department, or board of such entities; or another form of local government.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0263
000248
- 1 -